Illinois, session 104th, HB2647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Community College Act is amended by 5adding Section 3-29.28 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 805/3-29.28 new)7    Sec. 3-29.28. Small business leadership fast-track 8program. Each board shall provide a small business leadership 9fast-track program to help women who wish to become small 10business owners as contractors in trade fields.